Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington is experiencing a structural housing affordability and attainability crisis that has placed homeownership beyond the reach of many hard-working families. The Washington center for housing studies shows that nearly four out of five Washington households cannot afford a median-priced home. The impacts of this shortage fall most heavily on rural and historically marginalized communities, where limited housing options constrain economic opportunity, undermine housing stability, and restrict long-term wealth-building.The legislature further finds that this crisis is not the result of insufficient demand or a failure of the private market to produce housing, but rather the predictable outcome of Washington's land use and growth management framework as implemented over the past 35 years. The growth management act was intended to direct growth through comprehensive planning, yet in practice its implementation has shifted decision making away from adopted plans, toward localized discretion and repeated project-level review.The legislature finds that repeated attempts to operate within and incrementally adjust this framework have not matched the scale or urgency of the housing emergency. The legislature further finds that continued reliance on this framework has increased land and development costs through delay and uncertainty without producing measurable public benefit. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to modernize the state's housing policy framework to ensure that housing consistent with adopted plans and environmental standards can be delivered in a predictable, timely, and cost-effective manner.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.020 and 2023 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The following goals are adopted to guide the development and adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and, where specified, also guide the development of regional policies, plans, and strategies adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and chapter 47.80 RCW. The following goals are ((not)) listed in order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the development of comprehensive plans, development regulations, and, where specified, regional plans, policies, and strategies:(1) Housing. Plan for and accommodate housing affordable to all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.(2) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.(3) Permits. Applications for both state and local government permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability.(4) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to support development are adequate to serve the development at the time the development is available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service levels below locally established minimum standards.(5) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.(((2)))(6) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.(((3)))(7) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that will reduce greenhouse gas emissions and per capita vehicle miles traveled, and are based on regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive plans.(((4) Housing. Plan for and accommodate housing affordable to all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.(5)))(8) Economic development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public services, and public facilities.(((6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability.(8)))(9) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive forestlands and productive agricultural lands, and discourage incompatible uses.(((9)))(10) Open space and recreation. Retain open space and green space, enhance recreational opportunities, enhance fish and wildlife habitat, increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks and recreation facilities.(((10)))(11) Environment. Protect and enhance the environment and enhance the state's high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the availability of water.(((11)))(12) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens in the planning process, including the participation of vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, and ensure coordination between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.(((12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to support development shall be adequate to serve the development at the time the development is available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service levels below locally established minimum standards.))(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.(14) Climate change and resiliency. Ensure that comprehensive plans, development regulations, and regional policies, plans, and strategies under RCW 36.70A.210 and chapter 47.80 RCW adapt to and mitigate the effects of a changing climate; support reductions in greenhouse gas emissions and per capita vehicle miles traveled; prepare for climate impact scenarios; foster resiliency to climate impacts and natural hazards; protect and enhance environmental, economic, and human health and safety; and advance environmental justice.(15) Shorelines of the state. For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 shall be considered an element of the county's or city's comprehensive plan.Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.070 and 2024 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140. Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:(1) A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces and green spaces, urban and community forests within the urban growth area, general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies. The land use element must give special consideration to achieving environmental justice in its goals and policies, including efforts to avoid creating or worsening environmental health disparities. Wherever possible, the land use element should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote physical activity and reduce per capita vehicle miles traveled within the jurisdiction, but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage, flooding, and stormwater runoff in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound. The land use element must reduce and mitigate the risk to lives and property posed by wildfires by using land use planning tools, which may include, but are not limited to, adoption of portions or all of the wildland urban interface code developed by the international code council or developing building and maintenance standards consistent with the firewise USA program or similar program designed to reduce wildfire risk, reducing wildfire risks to residential development in high risk areas and the wildland urban interface area, separating human development from wildfire prone landscapes, and protecting existing residential development and infrastructure through community wildfire preparedness and fire adaptation measures.(2) A housing element ensuring the ((vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods that))housing is available for citizens of all income segments:(a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth, as provided by the department of commerce, including:(i) Units for moderate, low, very low, and extremely low-income households; and(ii) Emergency housing, emergency shelters, and permanent supportive housing;(b) Includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing, including single-family residences, and within an urban growth area boundary, moderate density housing options including, but not limited to, duplexes, triplexes, and townhomes;(c) Identifies sufficient capacity of land for housing including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing for moderate, low, very low, and extremely low-income households, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, group homes, foster care facilities, emergency housing, emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, and within an urban growth area boundary, consideration of duplexes, triplexes, and townhomes;(d) Makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all economic segments of the community, including:(i) Incorporating consideration for low, very low, extremely low, and moderate-income households;(ii) Documenting programs and actions needed to achieve housing availability including gaps in local funding, barriers such as development regulations, and other limitations;(iii) Consideration of housing locations in relation to employment location; and(iv) Consideration of the role of accessory dwelling units in meeting housing needs;(e) Identifies local policies and regulations that result in racially disparate impacts, displacement, and exclusion in housing, including:(i) Zoning that may have a discriminatory effect;(ii) Disinvestment; and(iii) Infrastructure availability;(f) Identifies and implements policies and regulations to address and begin to undo racially disparate impacts, displacement, and exclusion in housing caused by local policies, plans, and actions;(g) Identifies areas that may be at higher risk of displacement from market forces that occur with changes to zoning development regulations and capital investments; and(h) Establishes antidisplacement policies, with consideration given to the preservation of historical and cultural communities as well as investments in low, very low, extremely low, and moderate-income housing; equitable development initiatives; inclusionary zoning; community planning requirements; tenant protections; land disposition policies; and consideration of land that may be used for affordable housing.In counties and cities subject to the review and evaluation requirements of RCW 36.70A.215, any revision to the housing element shall include consideration of prior review and evaluation reports and any reasonable measures identified. The housing element should link jurisdictional goals with overall county goals to ensure that the housing element goals are met.The adoption of ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 that increase housing capacity, increase housing affordability, and mitigate displacement as required under this subsection (2) and that apply outside of critical areas are not subject to administrative or judicial appeal under chapter 43.21C RCW unless the adoption of such ordinances, development regulations and amendments to such regulations, or other nonproject actions has a probable significant adverse impact on fish habitat.(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities, including green infrastructure, showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan element.The county or city shall identify all public entities that own capital facilities and endeavor in good faith to work with other public entities, such as special purpose districts, to gather and include within its capital facilities element the information required by this subsection. If, after a good faith effort, the county or city is unable to gather the information required by this subsection from the other public entities, the failure to include such information in its capital facilities element cannot be grounds for a finding of noncompliance or invalidity under chapter 228, Laws of 2023. A good faith effort must, at a minimum, include consulting the public entity's capital facility or system plans and emailing and calling the staff of the public entity.(4)(a) A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities including, but not limited to, electrical, telecommunications, and natural gas systems.(b) The county or city shall identify all public entities that own utility systems and endeavor in good faith to work with other public entities, such as special purpose districts, to gather and include within its utilities element the information required in (a) of this subsection. However, if, after a good faith effort, the county or city is unable to gather the information required in (a) of this subsection from the other public entities, the failure to include such information in the utilities element shall not be grounds for a finding of noncompliance or invalidity under chapter 228, Laws of 2023. A good faith effort must, at a minimum, include consulting the public entity's capital facility or system plans, and emailing and calling the staff of the public entity.(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural economic advancement, densities, and uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established by the county, by:(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and groundwater resources; and(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited area as follows:(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use area are subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but are not subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection.(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population.(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size, scale, use, or intensity may be permitted subject to confirmation from all existing providers of public facilities and public services of sufficient capacity of existing public facilities and public services to serve any new or additional demand from the new development or redevelopment. Development and redevelopment may include changes in use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5) and is consistent with the local character. Any commercial development or redevelopment within a mixed-use area must be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and must meet the following requirements:(I) Any included retail or food service space must not exceed the footprint of previously occupied space or 5,000 square feet, whichever is greater, for the same or similar use, unless the retail space is for an essential rural retail service and the designated limited area is located at least 10 miles from an existing urban growth area, then the retail space must not exceed the footprint of the previously occupied space or 10,000 square feet, whichever is greater; and(II) Any included retail or food service space must not exceed 2,500 square feet for a new use, unless the new retail space is for an essential rural retail service and the designated limited area is located at least 10 miles from an existing urban growth area, then the new retail space must not exceed 10,000 square feet;For the purposes of this subsection (5)(d), "essential rural retail services" means services including grocery, pharmacy, hardware, automotive parts, and similar uses that sell or provide products necessary for health and safety, such as food, medication, sanitation supplies, and products to maintain habitability and mobility;(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the rural character of the area as defined by the local government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((35))). Rural counties may also allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((35))). Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such existing areas shall not extend beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area, thereby allowing a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B) physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;(v) For purposes of this subsection (5)(d), an existing area or existing use is one that was in existence:(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.(a) The transportation element shall include the following subelements:(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;(ii) Estimated multimodal level of service impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including transit alignments, active transportation facilities, and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and travel levels to inform future planning. This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or county's jurisdictional boundaries;(B) Multimodal level of service standards for all locally owned arterials, locally and regionally operated transit routes that serve urban growth areas, state-owned or operated transit routes that serve urban areas if the department of transportation has prepared such standards, and active transportation facilities to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system and success in helping to achieve the goals of this chapter consistent with environmental justice. These standards should be regionally coordinated;(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, multimodal level of service standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting multimodal level of service standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road, active transportation, or transit program and the office of financial management's ten-year investment program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance transportation facilities or services that are below an established multimodal level of service standard;(E) Forecasts of multimodal transportation demand and needs within cities and urban growth areas, and forecasts of multimodal transportation demand and needs outside of cities and urban growth areas, for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to inform the development of a transportation element that balances transportation system safety and convenience to accommodate all users of the transportation system to safely, reliably, and efficiently provide access and mobility to people and goods. Priority must be given to inclusion of transportation facilities and services providing the greatest multimodal safety benefit to each category of roadway users for the context and speed of the facility;(F) Identification of state and local system needs to equitably meet current and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW. Local system needs should reflect the regional transportation system and local goals, and strive to equitably implement the multimodal network;(G) A transition plan for transportation as required in Title II of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (ADA). As a necessary step to a program access plan to provide accessibility under the ADA, state and local government, public entities, and public agencies are required to perform self-evaluations of their current facilities, relative to accessibility requirements of the ADA. The agencies are then required to develop a program access plan, which can be called a transition plan, to address any deficiencies. The plan is intended to achieve the following:(I) Identify physical obstacles that limit the accessibility of facilities to individuals with disabilities;(II) Describe the methods to be used to make the facilities accessible;(III) Provide a schedule for making the access modifications; and(IV) Identify the public officials responsible for implementation of the transition plan;(iv) Finance, including:(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting the identified needs of the transportation system, including state transportation facilities, a discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;(vi) Demand-management strategies;(vii) Active transportation component to include collaborative efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for active transportation facilities and corridors that address and encourage enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of service on a locally owned or locally or regionally operated transportation facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may include active transportation facility improvements, increased or enhanced public transportation service, ride-sharing programs, demand management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6), "concurrent with the development" means that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six years. If the collection of impact fees is delayed under RCW 82.02.050(3), the six-year period required by this subsection (6)(b) must begin after full payment of all impact fees is due to the county or city. A development proposal may not be denied for causing the level of service on a locally owned or locally or regionally operated transportation facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan where such impacts could be adequately mitigated through active transportation facility improvements, increased or enhanced public transportation service, ride-sharing programs, demand management, or other transportation systems management strategies funded by the development.(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6), the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.(7) An economic development element establishing local goals, policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality and a high quality of life. A city that has chosen to be a residential community is exempt from the economic development element requirement of this subsection.(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a) Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period; (b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; (c) an evaluation of tree canopy coverage within the urban growth area; and (d) an evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.(9)(a) A climate change and resiliency element that is designed to result in reductions in overall greenhouse gas emissions and that must enhance resiliency to and avoid the adverse impacts of climate change, which must include efforts to reduce localized greenhouse gas emissions and avoid creating or worsening localized climate impacts to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities.(b) The climate change and resiliency element shall include the following subelements:(i) A greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement;(ii) A resiliency subelement.(c) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement of the climate change and resiliency element is mandatory for the jurisdictions specified in RCW 36.70A.095 and is encouraged for all other jurisdictions, including those planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and those planning under chapter 36.70 RCW. The resiliency subelement of the climate change and resiliency element is mandatory for all jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and is encouraged for those jurisdictions planning under chapter 36.70 RCW.(d)(i) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelement of the comprehensive plan, and its related development regulations, must identify the actions the jurisdiction will take during the planning cycle consistent with the guidelines published by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 that will:(A) Result in reductions in overall greenhouse gas emissions generated by transportation and land use within the jurisdiction but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state;(B) Result in reductions in per capita vehicle miles traveled within the jurisdiction but without increasing greenhouse gas emissions elsewhere in the state; and(C) Prioritize reductions that benefit overburdened communities in order to maximize the cobenefits of reduced air pollution and environmental justice.(ii) Actions not specifically identified in the guidelines developed by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 may be considered consistent with these guidelines only if:(A) They are projected to achieve greenhouse gas emissions reductions or per capita vehicle miles traveled reductions equivalent to what would be required of the jurisdiction under the guidelines adopted by the department; and(B) They are supported by scientifically credible projections and scenarios that indicate their adoption is likely to result in reductions of greenhouse gas emissions or per capita vehicle miles traveled.(iii) A jurisdiction may not restrict population growth or limit population allocation in order to achieve the requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(d).(e)(i) The resiliency subelement must equitably enhance resiliency to, and avoid or substantially reduce the adverse impacts of, climate change in human communities and ecological systems through goals, policies, and programs consistent with the best available science and scientifically credible climate projections and impact scenarios that moderate or avoid harm, enhance the resiliency of natural and human systems, and enhance beneficial opportunities. The resiliency subelement must prioritize actions that benefit overburdened communities that will disproportionately suffer from compounding environmental impacts and will be most impacted by natural hazards due to climate change. Specific goals, policies, and programs of the resiliency subelement must include, but are not limited to, those designed to:(A) Identify, protect, and enhance natural areas to foster resiliency to climate impacts, as well as areas of vital habitat for safe passage and species migration;(B) Identify, protect, and enhance community resiliency to climate change impacts, including social, economic, and built environment factors, that support adaptation to climate impacts consistent with environmental justice; and(C) Address natural hazards created or aggravated by climate change, including sea level rise, landslides, flooding, drought, heat, smoke, wildfire, and other effects of changes to temperature and precipitation patterns.(ii) A natural hazard mitigation plan or similar plan that is guided by RCW 36.70A.020(14), that prioritizes actions that benefit overburdened communities, and that complies with the applicable requirements of this chapter, including the requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(e), may be adopted by reference to satisfy these requirements, except that to the extent any of the substantive requirements of this subsection (9)(e) are not addressed, or are inadequately addressed, in the referenced natural hazard mitigation plan, a county or city must supplement the natural hazard mitigation plan accordingly so that the adopted resiliency subelement complies fully with the substantive requirements of this subsection (9)(e).(A) If a county or city intends to adopt by reference a federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan in order to meet all or part of the substantive requirements set forth in this subsection (9)(e), and the most recently adopted federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan does not comply with the requirements of this subsection (9)(e), the department may grant the county or city an extension of time in which to submit a natural hazard mitigation plan.(B) Eligibility for an extension under this subsection prior to July 1, 2027, is limited to a city or county required to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan on or before June 30, 2025, as provided in RCW 36.70A.130, or for a city or county with an existing, unexpired federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan scheduled to expire before December 31, 2024.(C) Extension requests after July 1, 2027, may be granted if requirements for the resiliency subelement are amended or added by the legislature or if the department finds other circumstances that may result in a potential finding of noncompliance with a jurisdiction's existing and approved federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan.(D) A city or county that wishes to request an extension of time must submit a request in writing to the department no later than the date on which the city or county is required to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan as provided in RCW 36.70A.130.(E) Upon the submission of such a request to the department, the city or county may have an additional 48 months from the date provided in RCW 36.70A.130 in which to either adopt by reference an updated federal emergency management agency natural hazard mitigation plan or adopt its own natural hazard mitigation plan, and to then submit that plan to the department.(F) The adoption of ordinances, amendments to comprehensive plans, amendments to development regulations, and other nonproject actions taken by a county or city pursuant to (d) of this subsection in order to implement measures specified by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.45.120 are not subject to administrative or judicial appeal under chapter 43.21C RCW.(10) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and distributed by the state at least two years before local government must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.340 and 2013 c 225 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:Upon receipt from the ((board of a finding that a state agency, county, or city))department of a finding that a county or city is in noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.330, or as a result of failure to meet the requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, the governor may either:(1) Notify and direct the director of the office of financial management to revise allotments in appropriation levels;(2) Notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the portion of revenues to which the county or city is entitled under one or more of the following: The motor vehicle fuel tax, as provided in chapter 82.38 RCW; the transportation improvement account, as provided in RCW 47.26.084; the rural arterial trust account, as provided in RCW 36.79.150; the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14 RCW; the liquor profit tax, as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise tax, as provided in RCW 82.08.170; or(3) File a notice of noncompliance with the secretary of state and the county or city, which temporarily rescinds the county or city's authority to collect the real estate excise tax under RCW 82.46.030 until the governor files a notice rescinding the notice of noncompliance.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70B.020 and 2025 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "By-right development" refers to the approval of proposed housing projects as a matter of right if they comply with established land use regulations without the need for discretionary review or approval.(2) "Closed record appeal" means an administrative appeal on the record to a local government body or officer, including the legislative body, following an open record hearing on a project permit application when the appeal is on the record with no or limited new evidence or information allowed to be submitted and only appeal argument allowed.(((2)))(3) "Local government" means a county, city, or town.(((3)))(4) "Open record hearing" means a hearing, conducted by a single hearing body or officer authorized by the local government to conduct such hearings, that creates the local government's record through testimony and submission of evidence and information, under procedures prescribed by the local government by ordinance or resolution. An open record hearing may be held prior to a local government's decision on a project permit to be known as an "open record predecision hearing." An open record hearing may be held on an appeal, to be known as an "open record appeal hearing," if no open record predecision hearing has been held on the project permit.(((4)))(5)(a) "Project permit" or "project permit application" means any land use or environmental permit or license required from a local government for a project action, including but not limited to subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments, conditional uses, shoreline substantial development permits, site plan review, permits or approvals required by critical area ordinances, site-specific rezones which do not require a comprehensive plan amendment, but excluding the adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulations except as otherwise specifically included in this subsection.(b) "Project permit" or "project permit application" does not include building permits.(((5)))(6) "Public meeting" means an informal meeting, hearing, workshop, or other public gathering of people to obtain comments from the public or other agencies on a proposed project permit prior to the local government's decision. A public meeting may include, but is not limited to, a design review or architectural control board meeting, a special review district or community council meeting, or a scoping meeting on a draft environmental impact statement. A public meeting does not include an open record hearing. The proceedings at a public meeting may be recorded and a report or recommendation may be included in the local government's project permit application file.Sec. 6. RCW 36.70B.030 and 1995 c 347 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Fundamental land use planning choices made in adopted comprehensive plans and development regulations shall serve as the foundation for project review. The review of a proposed project's consistency with applicable development regulations, or in the absence of applicable regulations the adopted comprehensive plan, under RCW 36.70B.040 shall incorporate the determinations under this section.(2) During project review, a local government or any subsequent reviewing body shall determine whether the items listed in this subsection are defined in the development regulations applicable to the proposed project or, in the absence of applicable regulations the adopted comprehensive plan. At a minimum, such applicable regulations or plans shall be determinative of the:(a) Type of land use permitted at the site, including uses that may be allowed under certain circumstances, such as planned unit developments and conditional and special uses, if the criteria for their approval have been satisfied;(b) Density of residential development in urban growth areas; and(c) Availability and adequacy of public facilities identified in the comprehensive plan, if the plan or development regulations provide for funding of these facilities as required by chapter 36.70A RCW.(3) During project review, the local government or any subsequent reviewing body shall not reexamine alternatives to or hear appeals on the items identified in subsection (2) of this section, except for issues of code interpretation. As part of its project review process, a local government shall provide a procedure for obtaining a code interpretation as provided in RCW 36.70B.110.(4) Pursuant to RCW 43.21C.240, a local government may determine that the requirements for environmental analysis and mitigation measures in development regulations and other applicable laws provide adequate mitigation for some or all of the project's specific adverse environmental impacts to which the requirements apply.(5) Nothing in this section limits the authority of a permitting agency to approve, condition, or deny a project as provided in its development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW and in its policies adopted under RCW 43.21C.060. Project review shall be used to identify specific project design and conditions ((relating to the character of development)), such as the details of site plans, curb cuts, drainage swales, transportation demand management, the payment of impact fees, or other measures to mitigate a proposal's probable adverse environmental impacts, if applicable.(6) Subsections (1) through (4) of this section apply only to local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040.Sec. 7. RCW 36.70B.070 and 2023 c 338 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Within 28 days after receiving a project permit application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a written determination to the applicant.(b) The written determination must state either:(i) That the application is complete; or(ii) That the application is incomplete and that the procedural submission requirements of the local government have not been met. The determination shall outline what is necessary to make the application procedurally complete.(c) The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day.(d) To the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.(2) A project permit application is complete for purposes of this section when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government, as outlined on the project permit application. Additional information or studies may be required or project modifications may be undertaken subsequent to the procedural review of the application by the local government. The determination of completeness ((shall not preclude))precludes the local government from requesting additional information or studies ((either at the time of))after the notice of completeness ((or subsequently if new information is required or))is issued. If substantial changes in the proposed action occur, the local government may request additional information or studies. However, if the procedural submission requirements, as outlined on the project permit application have been provided, the need for additional information or studies may not preclude a completeness determination.(3) The determination of completeness may include or be combined with the following:(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation;(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040; or(c) ((Other information the local government chooses to include; or(d))) The notice of application pursuant to the requirements in RCW 36.70B.110.(4)(a) An application shall be deemed procedurally complete on the 29th day after receiving a project permit application under this section if the local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is procedurally incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section. ((When the local government does not provide a written determination, they may still seek additional information or studies as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.(b) Within 14 days after an applicant has submitted to a local government additional information identified by the local government as being necessary for a complete application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether the application is complete or what additional information is necessary.(c)))(b) The notice of application shall be provided within 14 days after the determination of completeness pursuant to RCW 36.70B.110.Sec. 8. RCW 36.70B.080 and 2025 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 must establish and implement time periods for local government actions for each type of project permit application and provide timely and predictable procedures to determine whether a completed project permit application meets the requirements of those development regulations. Except for modifications by a jurisdiction provided for in (e) of this subsection, the time periods for local government actions for each type of complete project permit application or project type may not exceed those specified in this section.(b) For project permits submitted after January 1, 2025, the development regulations must, for each type of permit application, specify the contents of a completed project permit application necessary for the complete compliance with the time periods and procedures.(c) A jurisdiction may exclude certain permit types and timelines for processing project permit applications as provided for in RCW 36.70B.140.(d) The time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of complete project permit application or project type subject to this chapter should not exceed the following time periods unless modified by the local government pursuant to this section or RCW 36.70B.140:(i) For project permits which do not require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 65 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070;(ii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 100 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070; and(iii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110 and a public hearing, a local government must issue a final decision within 170 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070.(e) A jurisdiction may modify the provisions in (d) of this subsection to add permit types not identified, change the permit names or types in each category, address how consolidated review time periods may be different than permits submitted individually, and provide for how projects of a certain size or type may be differentiated, including by differentiating between permits that include a residential land use as a principal use of the land and permits that do not. Unless otherwise provided for the consolidated review of more than one permit, the time period for a final decision shall be the longest of the permit time periods identified in (d) of this subsection or as amended by a local government.(f) If a local government does not adopt an ordinance or resolution modifying the provisions in (d) of this subsection, the time periods in (d) of this subsection apply.(g) The number of days an application is in review with the county or city shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the project permit application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day and excluding the following time periods:(i) Any period between the day that the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application and the day when responsive information is resubmitted by the applicant;(ii) Any period after an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that they would like to temporarily suspend review of the project permit application until the time that the applicant notifies the local government, in writing, that they would like to resume the application. A local government may set conditions for the temporary suspension of a permit application; and(iii) Any period after an administrative appeal is filed until the administrative appeal is resolved and any additional time period provided by the administrative appeal has expired.(h) The time periods for a local government to process a permit shall start over if an applicant proposes a change in use that adds or removes commercial or residential elements from the original application that would make the application fail to meet the determination of procedural completeness for the new use, as required by the local government under RCW 36.70B.070. The local government may not require an applicant to restart the permitting process, including paying duplicative fees, if the applicant desires to increase density of housing units on the same parcel of land as the original permit application.(i) If, at any time, an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that the applicant would like to temporarily suspend the review of the project for more than 60 days, or if an applicant is not responsive for more than 60 consecutive days after the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application, an additional 30 days may be added to the time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of project permit that is subject to this chapter. Any written notice from the local government to the applicant that additional information is required to further process the application must include a notice that nonresponsiveness for 60 consecutive days may result in 30 days being added to the time for review. For the purposes of this subsection, "nonresponsiveness" means that an applicant is not making demonstrable progress on providing additional requested information to the local government, or that there is no ongoing communication from the applicant to the local government on the applicant's ability or willingness to provide the additional information.(j) Annual amendments to the comprehensive plan are not subject to the requirements of this section.(k) A county's or city's adoption of a resolution or ordinance to implement this subsection shall not be subject to appeal under chapter 36.70A RCW unless the resolution or ordinance modifies the time periods provided in (d) of this subsection by providing for a review period of more than 170 days for any project permit.(l)(i) When permit time periods provided for in (d) of this subsection, as may be amended by a local government, and as may be extended as provided for in (i) of this subsection, are not met, a portion of the permit fee must be refunded to the applicant as provided in this subsection. A local government may provide for the collection of only 80 percent of a permit fee initially, and for the collection of the remaining balance if the permitting time periods are met. The portion of the fee refunded for missing time periods shall be:(A) 10 percent if the final decision of the project permit application was made after the applicable deadline but the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of issuance of the final decision did not exceed 20 percent of the original time period; or(B) 20 percent if the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of the issuance of the final decision exceeded 20 percent of the original time period.(ii) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.160, the provisions in (([(l)]))(l)(i) of this subsection are not applicable to cities and counties which have implemented at least three of the options in RCW 36.70B.160(1) (a) through (j) at the time an application is deemed procedurally complete.(2)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 and the cities within those counties that have populations of at least 20,000 must, for each type of permit application, identify the total number of project permit applications for which decisions are issued according to the provisions of this chapter. For each type of project permit application identified, these counties and cities must establish and implement a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as required by subsection (1) of this section and minimum requirements for applications to be deemed complete under RCW 36.70B.070 as required by subsection (1) of this section.(b) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection also must prepare an annual performance report that includes information outlining time periods for certain permit types associated with housing. The report must provide:(i) Permit time periods for certain permit processes in the county or city in relation to those established under this section, including whether the county or city has established shorter time periods than those provided in this section;(ii) The total number of decisions issued during the year for the following permit types: Preliminary subdivisions, final subdivisions, binding site plans, permit processes associated with the approval of multifamily housing, and construction plan review for each of these permit types when submitted separately;(iii) The total number of decisions for each permit type which included consolidated project permit review, such as concurrent review of a rezone or construction plans;(iv) The average number of days from a submittal to a decision being issued for the project permit types listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day;(v) The total number of days each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection was in review with the county or city. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day. The days the application is in review with the county or city does not include the time periods in subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section;(vi) The total number of days that were excluded from the time period calculation under subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section for each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection.(c) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection must:(i) Post the annual performance report through the county's or city's website; and(ii) Submit the annual performance report to the department of commerce by March 1st each year.(d) No later than July 1st each year, the department of commerce shall publish a report which includes the annual performance report data for each county and city subject to the requirements of this subsection and a list of those counties and cities whose time periods are shorter than those provided for in this section.The annual report must also include key metrics and findings from the information collected.(e) The initial annual report required under this subsection must be submitted to the department of commerce by March 1, 2025, and must include information from permitting in 2024.(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project permit application for any reasonable and certain period of time specified and mutually agreed upon in writing by the applicant and the local government. No local government may require or request an extension of an applicable deadline for issuance of a decision for a specific project permit application as a condition or an option at initial submission of a project permit application.Sec. 9. RCW 36.70B.140 and 2025 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A local government by ordinance or resolution may exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 through 36.70B.080 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Landmark designations, street vacations, or other approvals relating to the use of public areas or facilities, or other project permits, whether administrative or quasi-judicial, that the local government by ordinance or resolution has determined present special circumstances that warrant a review process or time periods for approval which are different from that provided in RCW 36.70B.060 through 36.70B.080 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130.(2) A local government by ordinance or resolution also may exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Lot line or boundary adjustments and other construction permits, or similar administrative approvals, categorically exempt from environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW, or for which environmental review has been completed in connection with other project permits.(3) A local government must exclude project permits for interior alterations from site plan review, provided that the interior alterations do not result in the following:(a) Additional sleeping quarters or bedrooms;(b) Nonconformity with federal emergency management agency substantial improvement thresholds; or(c) Increase the total square footage or valuation of the structure thereby requiring upgraded fire access or fire suppression systems.(4)(a) All proposed residential developments, including accessory dwelling units and multifamily housing units, that meet the criteria outlined in the zoning code and land use regulations shall be approved as by-right developments, without the need for discretionary review or approval by planning commissions, zoning boards, or other regulatory bodies.(b) Local governments shall monitor compliance through existing inspection authority with approved by-right developments of housing to ensure adherence to applicable land use regulations and codes.(c) Noncompliance with approvals of by-right developments may result in enforcement actions. Enforcement actions must be limited to project modifications to bring the development into compliance.(5) Nothing in this section exempts interior alterations from otherwise applicable building, plumbing, mechanical, or electrical codes.(((5)))(6) For purposes of this section, "interior alterations" include construction activities that do not modify the existing site layout or its current use and involve no exterior work adding to the building footprint.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings boardâCreationâMembers) and 2020 c 214 s 1, 2010 c 211 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 29, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;(2) RCW 36.70A.252 (Growth management hearings boardâConsolidation into environmental and land use hearings office) and 2020 c 214 s 2 & 2010 c 210 s 15;(3) RCW 36.70A.260 (Growth management hearings boardâRegional panels) and 2020 c 214 s 3, 2010 c 211 s 5, 1994 c 249 s 30, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;(4) RCW 36.70A.270 (Growth management hearings boardâConduct, procedure, and compensationâPublic access to rulings, decisions, and orders) and 2020 c 214 s 4 & 2019 c 452 s 2;(5) RCW 36.70A.280 (Growth management hearings boardâMatters subject to review) and 2025 c 386 s 3 & 2025 c 269 s 2;(6) RCW 36.70A.290 (Growth management hearings boardâPetitionsâEvidence) and 2025 c 269 s 3, 2011 c 277 s 1, 2010 c 211 s 8, 1997 c 429 s 12, & 1995 c 347 s 109;(7) RCW 36.70A.295 (Growth management hearings boardâDirect judicial review) and 2010 c 211 s 9 & 1997 c 429 s 13;(8) RCW 36.70A.300 (Final orders) and 2013 c 275 s 1, 1997 c 429 s 14, 1995 c 347 s 110, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 11;(9) RCW 36.70A.302 (Growth management hearings boardâDetermination of invalidityâVesting of development permitsâInterim controls) and 2010 c 211 s 10 & 1997 c 429 s 16;(10) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and 1996 c 325 s 4;(11) RCW 36.70A.310 (Growth management hearings boardâLimitations on appeal by the state) and 2010 c 211 s 11, 1994 c 249 s 32, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 12;(12) RCW 36.70A.320 (Presumption of validityâBurden of proofâPlans and regulations) and 2025 c 269 s 4, 2023 c 228 s 8, 1997 c 429 s 20, 1995 c 347 s 111, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 13;(13) RCW 36.70A.3201 (Growth management hearings boardâLegislative intent and finding) and 2010 c 211 s 12 & 1997 c 429 s 2;(14) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 2025 c 17 s 1, 2021 c 312 s 2, 1997 c 429 s 21, 1995 c 347 s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14;(15) RCW 36.70A.332 (Training regarding findings of noncompliance) and 2021 c 312 s 3; and(16) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity issued before July 27, 1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22.--- END ---